Hawaii statutes.
§76-103 Veteran's preference. The
extent to which veteran's preference shall be given to veterans, to disabled
veterans, to spouses of disabled veterans, and to surviving spouses of deceased
servicemen who have not remarried shall be provided by rules and regulations.
[L 1955, c 274, pt of §1; RL 1955, §3-81; am L 1967, c 279, §1; HRS §76-103; am
L 1973, c 177, §1(3)]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next